Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 10. Youthful Offender Program

§ 7-13-1001.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Department” means the department of corrections;

“Peer specialists” means long-term inmates who have completed certified training and been selected and assigned by the department to provide positive guided peer support to offenders involved in the program under the direction of program staff, provided that peer specialists shall not have direct supervision over other inmates;

“Reduction of sentence” includes changing a sentence of incarceration to a grant of probation.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 68, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2021 ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(ii); and redesignated former (a)(ii) as (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Sentencing court discretion —

Discretion given to the sentencing court, whether under the Youthful Offender Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1001

et seq., or under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35(b), is the same. The Supreme Court of Wyoming will affirm a district court's decision on whether to grant a sentence reduction so long as there is a rational basis, supported by substantial evidence, from which the district court could reasonably draw its conclusion. Mendoza v. State, 2016 WY 31, 368 P.3d 886,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2016).

Completion of the boot camp program is an accomplishment that may weigh in favor of sentence reduction. However, that accomplishment is only one of any number of factors which may properly be considered by a district court in its discretion to determine whether to grant or deny a motion for sentence reduction under the Youthful Offender Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1001

et seq., or pursuant to Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35(b). Mendoza v. State, 2016 WY 31, 368 P.3d 886,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2016).

Considering the nature of the underlying crimes and denying defendant's request for probation after he had successfully completed boot camp was not an abuse of discretion given the gravity of the crimes. Mendoza v. State, 2016 WY 31, 368 P.3d 886,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 7-13-1002.
Sentence reduction for youthful offenders.

The sentencing court may reduce the sentence of any convicted felon who:

Is recommended by the sentencing court for placement in the youthful offender transition program;

Is certified by the department as having successfully completed the youthful offender transition program under W.S.

7-13-1003

; and

Makes application to the court for a reduction in sentence within one (1) year after the individual began serving a sentence of incarceration at a state penal institution.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 68, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2021 ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(i); redesignated former (a)(i) as (a)(ii), and added "transition" preceding "program"; redesignated former (a)(ii) as (a)(iii), and added "for a reduction in sentence" following "the court."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited in

Mendoza v. State, 2016 WY 31, 368 P.3d 886,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 7-13-1003.
Establishment of program; eligibility; rulemaking authority.

The department shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations to establish a youthful offender transition program for inmates incarcerated in a state penal institution.

In addition to any other eligibility requirements adopted by the department, an inmate is eligible for placement in the youthful offender transition program only if he:

Is serving a sentence of imprisonment at a state penal institution for any offense other than a felony punishable by death or life imprisonment;

Has not attained the age of thirty (30) years;

Has not previously served a term of incarceration at any state or federal adult penal institution;

Is able to participate in the structured programming, education, work and physical fitness activities required of program participants in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act.

The program created by the department shall include:

Separation of program participants from the general inmate population except inmates assigned to work in the program as peer specialists;

Emphases upon structured programming, education, work and physical activity compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act as a major element of the program.

Participation by an inmate in the youthful offender transition program is a matter of grace and not of right. Approval of an inmate’s participation in the program may be revoked by the department at any time if the inmate fails to comply with program requirements. The inmate shall not have any right to appeal the denial of his participation in the program.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 68, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2021 ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "transition" preceding "program" in (a); added "transition" preceding "program" in (b); substituted "thirty (30) " for "twenty-five (25)" in (b)(ii); added (b)(iv); added "except inmates assigned to work in the program as peer specialists" at the end of (c)(i); rewrote (c)(ii), which read, "Emphasis upon work and physical activity as a major element of the program"; and added "transition" preceding "program" in the first sentence of (d).

Physical impairment disqualified from program participation. —

Although defendant had entered a plea agreement which recommended him for the Wyoming Youthful Offender Program, his inability to participate in the program due to a physical impairment did not violate the doctrines of equal protection and separation of powers and did not entitle the district court to correct his sentence. The defendant's plea was not induced by false promises and the error alleged did not fall within the narrow definition of illegal sentences; therefore, the warden's refusal to accept him in the program because of his physical injury was rationally related to a legitimate governmental interest and was supportable. Ellett v. State, 883 P.2d 940,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited in

Mendoza v. State, 2016 WY 31,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Mar. 9, 2016).